browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2744 Y 1
SFX 2744 0 egiant .
SFX 3148 Y 1
SFX 3148 0 niseschia .
SFX 4222 Y 1
SFX 4222 0 portada .
SFX 4220 Y 1
SFX 4220 0 portads .
SFX 1675 Y 1
SFX 1675 0 iunadas .
SFX 3949 Y 1
SFX 3949 0 tegna .
SFX 1934 Y 1
SFX 1934 0 diva .
SFX 4919 Y 1
SFX 4919 0 biliseschan .
SFX 4918 Y 1
SFX 4918 0 biliseschas .
SFX 4006 Y 1
SFX 4006 0 ssassan .
SFX 2547 Y 1
SFX 2547 0 nica .
SFX 4478 Y 1
SFX 4478 0 itschada .
SFX 4005 Y 1
SFX 4005 0 ssassas .
SFX 3785 Y 1
SFX 3785 0 tureschian .
SFX 680 Y 1
SFX 680 0 rassan .
SFX 3784 Y 1
SFX 3784 0 tureschias .
SFX 679 Y 1
SFX 679 0 rassas .
SFX 3541 Y 1
SFX 3541 0 card .
SFX 703 Y 1
SFX 703 0 ssa .
SFX 3168 Y 1
SFX 3168 0 nida .
SFX 563 Y 1
SFX 563 0 cass .
SFX 3210 Y 1
SFX 3210 0 minada .
SFX 835 Y 1
SFX 835 0 deschan .
SFX 834 Y 1
SFX 834 0 deschas .
SFX 3208 Y 1
SFX 3208 0 minads .
SFX 1458 Y 1
SFX 1458 0 sta .
SFX 2420 Y 1
SFX 2420 0 sts .
SFX 4337 Y 1
SFX 4337 0 nier .
SFX 2959 Y 1
SFX 2959 0 turadas .
SFX 2430 Y 1
SFX 2430 0 stai .
SFX 1243 Y 1
SFX 1243 0 star .
SFX 3054 Y 1
SFX 3054 0 stas .
SFX 1602 Y 1
SFX 1602 0 sum .
SFX 2419 Y 1
SFX 2419 0 sun .
SFX 3979 Y 1
SFX 3979 0 sur .
SFX 1527 Y 1
SFX 1527 0 itur .
SFX 695 Y 1
SFX 695 0 egiass .
SFX 770 Y 1
SFX 770 0 unai .
SFX 3734 Y 1
SFX 3734 0 unal .
SFX 1423 Y 1
SFX 1423 0 unan .
SFX 2129 Y 1
SFX 2129 0 raziun .
SFX 737 Y 1
SFX 737 0 unar .
SFX 736 Y 1
SFX 736 0 unas .
SFX 4218 Y 1
SFX 4218 0 portain .
SFX 4217 Y 1
SFX 4217 0 portais .
SFX 560 Y 1
SFX 560 0 cava .
SFX 938 Y 1
SFX 938 0 tgass .
SFX 694 Y 1
SFX 694 0 egiava .
SFX 4416 Y 1
SFX 4416 0 linavan .
SFX 2935 Y 1
SFX 2935 0 uissan .
SFX 4415 Y 1
SFX 4415 0 linavas .
SFX 2934 Y 1
SFX 2934 0 uissas .
SFX 2033 Y 1
SFX 2033 0 unda .
SFX 1114 Y 1
SFX 1114 0 ster .
SFX 3206 Y 1
SFX 3206 0 minain .
SFX 3205 Y 1
SFX 3205 0 minais .
SFX 4770 Y 1
SFX 4770 0 ellaziun .
SFX 1790 Y 1
SFX 1790 0 uner .
SFX 2032 Y 1
SFX 2032 0 unet .
SFX 4917 Y 1
SFX 4917 0 biliseschia .
SFX 2328 Y 1
SFX 2328 0 agls .
SFX 989 Y 1
SFX 989 0 tgava .
SFX 430 Y 1
SFX 430 0 tevan .
SFX 429 Y 1
SFX 429 0 tevas .
SFX 2433 Y 1
SFX 2433 0 stada .
SFX 2431 Y 1
SFX 2431 0 stads .
SFX 791 Y 1
SFX 791 0 deschia .
SFX 3595 Y 1
SFX 3595 0 agna .
SFX 2837 Y 1
SFX 2837 0 aschada .
SFX 3751 Y 1
SFX 3751 0 uissem .
SFX 2835 Y 1
SFX 2835 0 aschads .
SFX 3045 Y 1
SFX 3045 0 stia .
SFX 940 Y 1
SFX 940 0 stic .
SFX 2606 Y 1
SFX 2606 0 isatur .
SFX 3650 Y 1
SFX 3650 0 vassan .
SFX 3649 Y 1
SFX 3649 0 vassas .
SFX 2815 Y 1
SFX 2815 0 atisada .
SFX 4709 Y 1
SFX 4709 0 etica .
SFX 2813 Y 1
SFX 2813 0 atisads .
SFX 673 Y 1
SFX 673 0 unada .
SFX 771 Y 1
SFX 771 0 unads .
SFX 1327 Y 1
SFX 1327 0 unia .
SFX 1693 Y 1
SFX 1693 0 irada .
SFX 1487 Y 1
SFX 1487 0 letta .
SFX 2218 Y 1
SFX 2218 0 irads .
SFX 1025 Y 1
SFX 1025 0 chesch .
SFX 3999 Y 1
SFX 3999 0 ssond .
SFX 4519 Y 1
SFX 4519 0 istidas .
SFX 833 Y 1
SFX 833 0 deschian .
SFX 832 Y 1
SFX 832 0 deschias .
SFX 2429 Y 1
SFX 2429 0 stain .
SFX 3767 Y 1
SFX 3767 0 ualiseschan .
SFX 4213 Y 1
SFX 4213 0 portass .
SFX 2428 Y 1
SFX 2428 0 stais .
SFX 3766 Y 1
SFX 3766 0 ualiseschas .
SFX 3731 Y 1
SFX 3731 0 unalisà .
SFX 2833 Y 1
SFX 2833 0 aschain .
SFX 2630 Y 1
SFX 2630 0 ileschian .
SFX 2832 Y 1
SFX 2832 0 aschais .
SFX 2629 Y 1
SFX 2629 0 ileschias .
SFX 240 Y 1
SFX 240 0 lai .
SFX 353 Y 1
SFX 353 0 lan .
SFX 3745 Y 1
SFX 3745 0 umond .
SFX 223 Y 1
SFX 223 0 lar .
SFX 156 Y 1
SFX 156 0 las .
SFX 3232 Y 1
SFX 3232 0 lat .
SFX 3280 Y 1
SFX 3280 0 imai .
SFX 4548 Y 1
SFX 4548 0 imal .
SFX 2626 Y 1
SFX 2626 0 imar .
SFX 3277 Y 1
SFX 3277 0 imas .
SFX 2811 Y 1
SFX 2811 0 atisain .
SFX 4334 Y 1
SFX 4334 0 nist .
SFX 2810 Y 1
SFX 2810 0 atisais .
SFX 4088 Y 1
SFX 4088 0 schentian .
SFX 4087 Y 1
SFX 4087 0 schentias .
SFX 769 Y 1
SFX 769 0 unain .
SFX 701 Y 1
SFX 701 0 unais .
SFX 3125 Y 1
SFX 3125 0 oraziun .
SFX 3203 Y 1
SFX 3203 0 minass .
SFX 4210 Y 1
SFX 4210 0 portava .
SFX 2216 Y 1
SFX 2216 0 irain .
SFX 2215 Y 1
SFX 2215 0 irais .
SFX 928 Y 1
SFX 928 0 abilitad .
SFX 4406 Y 1
SFX 4406 0 loga .
SFX 378 Y 1
SFX 378 0 entian .
SFX 377 Y 1
SFX 377 0 entias .
SFX 4775 Y 1
SFX 4775 0 ellassan .
SFX 4774 Y 1
SFX 4774 0 ellassas .
SFX 3733 Y 1
SFX 3733 0 unala .
SFX 42 Y 1
SFX 42 0 avan .
SFX 41 Y 1
SFX 41 0 avas .
SFX 3708 Y 1
SFX 3708 0 unals .
SFX 866 Y 1
SFX 866 0 lel .
SFX 4436 Y 1
SFX 4436 0 len .
SFX 1342 Y 1
SFX 1342 0 stra .
SFX 954 Y 1
SFX 954 0 ler .
SFX 3200 Y 1
SFX 3200 0 minava .
SFX 743 Y 1
SFX 743 0 let .
SFX 4955 Y 1
SFX 4955 0 badas .
SFX 2071 Y 1
SFX 2071 0 tinadas .
SFX 705 Y 1
SFX 705 0 mada .
SFX 4786 Y 1
SFX 4786 0 elà .
SFX 953 Y 1
SFX 953 0 mads .
SFX 4993 Y 1
SFX 4993 0 antina .
SFX 2903 Y 1
SFX 2903 0 unament .
SFX 4198 Y 1
SFX 4198 0 prai .
SFX 4196 Y 1
SFX 4196 0 pran .
SFX 3115 Y 1
SFX 3115 0 pras .
SFX 1407 Y 1
SFX 1407 0 atoric .
SFX 1714 Y 1
SFX 1714 0 idadas .
SFX 3765 Y 1
SFX 3765 0 ualiseschia .
SFX 2540 Y 1
SFX 2540 0 oritad .
SFX 696 Y 1
SFX 696 0 egià .
SFX 3691 Y 1
SFX 3691 0 unta .
SFX 877 Y 1
SFX 877 0 avel .
SFX 253 Y 1
SFX 253 0 lia .
SFX 3228 Y 1
SFX 3228 0 lic .
SFX 1869 Y 1
SFX 1869 0 lim .
SFX 780 Y 1
SFX 780 0 lin .
SFX 2573 Y 1
SFX 2573 0 lit .
SFX 1951 Y 1
SFX 1951 0 arisavan .
SFX 1950 Y 1
SFX 1950 0 arisavas .
SFX 3053 Y 1
SFX 3053 0 stass .
SFX 2140 Y 1
SFX 2140 0 ografica .
SFX 3259 Y 1
SFX 3259 0 isiun .
SFX 3667 Y 1
SFX 3667 0 upleschian .
SFX 3666 Y 1
SFX 3666 0 upleschias .
SFX 4374 Y 1
SFX 4374 0 mpai .
SFX 4371 Y 1
SFX 4371 0 mpan .
SFX 227 Y 1
SFX 227 0 lond .
SFX 4370 Y 1
SFX 4370 0 mpar .
SFX 4369 Y 1
SFX 4369 0 mpas .
SFX 4293 Y 1
SFX 4293 0 ochesch .
SFX 2828 Y 1
SFX 2828 0 aschass .
SFX 65 Y 1
SFX 65 0 main .
SFX 824 Y 1
SFX 824 0 mais .
SFX 2808 Y 1
SFX 2808 0 atisass .
SFX 2571 Y 1
SFX 2571 0 lla .
SFX 768 Y 1
SFX 768 0 unass .
SFX 1914 Y 1
SFX 1914 0 gnian .
SFX 1913 Y 1
SFX 1913 0 gnias .
SFX 1400 Y 1
SFX 1400 0 cziun .
SFX 3050 Y 1
SFX 3050 0 stava .
SFX 2213 Y 1
SFX 2213 0 irass .
SFX 3549 Y 1
SFX 3549 0 avia .
SFX 4816 Y 1
SFX 4816 0 ectada .
SFX 4292 Y 1
SFX 4292 0 ochescha .
SFX 4814 Y 1
SFX 4814 0 ectads .
SFX 4809 Y 1
SFX 4809 0 ectassan .
SFX 4808 Y 1
SFX 4808 0 ectassas .
SFX 1359 Y 1
SFX 1359 0 meschan .
SFX 1358 Y 1
SFX 1358 0 meschas .
SFX 1198 Y 1
SFX 1198 0 anzas .
SFX 2825 Y 1
SFX 2825 0 aschava .
SFX 1815 Y 1
SFX 1815 0 ticas .
SFX 986 Y 1
SFX 986 0 unza .
SFX 2569 Y 1
SFX 2569 0 mala .
SFX 4103 Y 1
SFX 4103 0 schentadas .
SFX 2805 Y 1
SFX 2805 0 atisava .
SFX 4195 Y 1
SFX 4195 0 pria .
SFX 4400 Y 1
SFX 4400 0 maticher .
SFX 765 Y 1
SFX 765 0 unava .
SFX 1048 Y 1
SFX 1048 0 log .
SFX 3227 Y 1
SFX 3227 0 lon .
SFX 2570 Y 1
SFX 2570 0 lot .
SFX 390 Y 1
SFX 390 0 nà .
SFX 1854 Y 1
SFX 1854 0 nitad .
SFX 2210 Y 1
SFX 2210 0 irava .
SFX 2548 Y 1
SFX 2548 0 nì .
SFX 2097 Y 1
SFX 2097 0 setta .
SFX 1309 Y 1
SFX 1309 0 avla .
SFX 2591 Y 1
SFX 2591 0 liada .
SFX 2589 Y 1
SFX 2589 0 liads .
SFX 4934 Y 1
SFX 4934 0 bilisada .
SFX 4932 Y 1
SFX 4932 0 bilisads .
SFX 3407 Y 1
SFX 3407 0 erladas .
SFX 1182 Y 1
SFX 1182 0 ditsch .
SFX 3975 Y 1
SFX 3975 0 talas .
SFX 4362 Y 1
SFX 4362 0 mpia .
SFX 4812 Y 1
SFX 4812 0 ectain .
SFX 4811 Y 1
SFX 4811 0 ectais .
SFX 1063 Y 1
SFX 1063 0 gavan .
SFX 1106 Y 1
SFX 1106 0 unescha .
SFX 1062 Y 1
SFX 1062 0 gavas .
SFX 2714 Y 1
SFX 2714 0 ereschan .
SFX 2713 Y 1
SFX 2713 0 ereschas .
SFX 4644 Y 1
SFX 4644 0 hent .
SFX 1711 Y 1
SFX 1711 0 idassan .
SFX 1710 Y 1
SFX 1710 0 idassas .
SFX 2667 Y 1
SFX 2667 0 iblas .
SFX 3303 Y 1
SFX 3303 0 ienta .
SFX 4077 Y 1
SFX 4077 0 schunas .
SFX 4197 Y 1
SFX 4197 0 prais .
SFX 1662 Y 1
SFX 1662 0 lun .
SFX 2587 Y 1
SFX 2587 0 liain .
SFX 1661 Y 1
SFX 1661 0 lus .
SFX 2586 Y 1
SFX 2586 0 liais .
SFX 892 Y 1
SFX 892 0 schavan .
SFX 2522 Y 1
SFX 2522 0 ppassan .
SFX 891 Y 1
SFX 891 0 schavas .
SFX 2521 Y 1
SFX 2521 0 ppassas .
SFX 952 Y 1
SFX 952 0 mass .
SFX 413 Y 1
SFX 413 0 zassan .
SFX 1357 Y 1
SFX 1357 0 meschia .
SFX 3916 Y 1
SFX 3916 0 tifitgavan .
SFX 412 Y 1
SFX 412 0 zassas .
SFX 2708 Y 1
SFX 2708 0 erond .
SFX 3915 Y 1
SFX 3915 0 tifitgavas .
