browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.dic
cham/141,370,627,642,666,667,693,694,695,696,1468,1750,2137,2744,3419
char/79,225,352,361,389,390,443,461,618,637,651,652,653,654,655,676,677,678,679,680,681,682,897,917,942,996,997,998,999,1092,1134,1176,1257,1258,1349,1483,1643,1748,1928,2548,3106,3107,3110,3111,3168,4281,4786
chaval/743,780,781,888,889,938,954,988,989,990,991,1032,1033,1034,1035,1036,1037,1038,1039,1363,1364
col/5,9,99,159,176,235,651,1262,1753,3231,3243,4204,4208,4209,4210,4211,4212,4213,4215,4217,4218,4219,4220,4221,4222,4223,4235,4742
Cro/177,1763,2547
dirigi/1,2,3,4,5,12,13,14,16,17,18,19,22,24,61,107,200,568,940,1098,1343,1606
dua/1,8,9,10,15,77,79,151,165,286,467,659,1049,1427,1486,1871,2168,2180,2206,3188,3189,3237,4337
flad/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,70,144,351,642,666,667,673,693,694,695,696,701,722,723,724,725,736,737,738,751,752,753,754,762,763,764,765,766,767,768,769,770,771,772,786,787,788,830,1327,1419,1420,1423,4469
fon/3,4,5,6,7,8,24,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,55,575,900,1180,1475,1476,1477,2139,2140,2291,2539,3415,3449,4277,4708,4709
ful/10,33,203,210,1573,3197,3198,3199,3200,3201,3202,3203,3204,3205,3206,3207,3208,3209,3210,3211,3268
fut/57,60,82,83,138,140,142,150,155,157,158,159,160,161,163,164,166,167,168,169,170,171,173,175,181,192,244,248,336,400,461,522,544,618,637,651,652,653,654,655,671,676,677,678,679,680,863,2108
giu/2,18,56,83,155,172,180,236,302,321,461,528,637,681,774,869,870,967,1010,1011,1012,1013,1060,1062,1063,1064,1065,1066,1067,1068,1071,1203,1243,1463,1466,1602,1824,2422,2428,2429,2430,2431,2432,2433,2850,3042,3045,3048,3049,3050,3051,3052,3053,3109,3988,3989,3990,3991,3992,3993,3994,4680
giuven/1,10,1000,1573,3949
gli/1,2,5,301,352,465,774,917,995,1458,1480,1483,3054
Grisch/1,5,6,144,351,368,736
guvern/1,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,199,295,331,539,570,732,2328,3554
import/48,49,50,51,52,68,141,144,298,673,701,737,738,762,763,764,765,766,767,768,769,770,771,772,1103,1104,1105,1106,1107,1421,1422
l'a/77,155,181,192,359,629,674,703,806,945,1028,1137,1289,1307,1400,1458,1466,1833,1875,2013,2017,2022,2093,2369,2768,3213,3226,3463,3464,4039,4237,4866
med/1,3,4,5,30,31,32,57,72,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,291,631,642,666,672,693,694,695,696,723,724,725,751,752,753,754,787,788,1180,3251
mega/107,1070,1243,2573
ora/249,465,607,778,1213,1245,1403,1429,1602,1782,2767,3347
para/74,409,425,441,454,602,668,669,697,720,726,727,728,748,755,756,757,758,791,792,793,832,833,834,835,901,1015,1069,1207,1291,1292,1293,1294,1295,1296,1297,1298,1299,1300,1362,1391,1558,1841,2011,2284,2550,2698,3423,3749,3995,4192,4390,4532,4912
parc/243,315,1304,1475,1574,2301,2329,3330,3417,3418,4769,4770,4771,4772,4773,4774,4775,4776,4777,4778,4779,4780,4781
pir/5,9,10,15,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,71,72,73,74,77,86,135,145,147,148,149,151,152,156,177,369,683,706,926,944,1099,1133,3595,3757
pluriling/1,1792,2384,3751
prer/631,2033
pula/337,665,1114,2319
repet/3,4,5,6,7,8,9,10,15,30,31,32,57,71,72,73,74,85,86,94,97,100,101,103,104,135,136,145,147,148,149,152,706,1368,1527,4591
rest/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,9,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,80,199,331,442,1198,1417,2129,2897,2900,2901,3646
scola/1343,2420
scumpar/1,3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,56,60,71,72,73,74,82,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,138,140,142,159,164,173,175,201,225,401,402,419,429,430,431,432,472,853,885,886,887,3869
tar/5,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,55,58,59,70,87,150,183,199,426,647,1041,1362,1467,1644,1841,1934,2083,2106,2310,2469,3222,4191,4587,4658,4659
tax/3,5,9,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,68,70,88,154,265,928,985,1262,1475,3126,3541
traffitga/1790
turn/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,70,98,136,141,191,195,254,314,325,329,330,340,341,342,343,344,345,346,347,348,349,355,356,377,378,379,380,965,993,1018,1246,1537,1759,3301,3322,3974,4478,4601,4602,4603,4604,4605,4606,4607,4608,4609,4610,4611,4612,4613,4614
vag/5,80,98,143,144,253,262,368,439,451,1699,2032,2623
